South Dakota, session 2026, SB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-26-37 be AMENDED:
1-26-37. An aggrieved party or the agency may obtain a review of any final
judgment of the circuit court under this chapter by appeal to the Supreme Court. The
appeal shall must be taken as in other civil cases. The Supreme Court shall give the same
deference to the findings of fact, conclusions of law, and final judgment of the circuit court
as it does to other appeals from the circuit court. Such The appeal may not be considered
de novo, except as required in section 2 of this Act.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 15-1:
In interpreting a state statute, administrative rule, or policy, a state court or an
officer hearing an administrative action may consider, but may not defer to, a state
agency's interpretation of the statute, rule, or policy, and must instead interpret its
meaning and effect de novo.
In actions brought by or against state agencies, after applying all customary tools
of interpretation, the court or hearing officer must exercise any remaining doubt in favor
of a reasonable interpretation that is consistent with an individual's fundamental
constitutional rights.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.